lexc/noun/enhuoe.lexc
!!!enhuoe.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat] +Pref+

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §AE1§
§VV§   §oeoez4§  §oeoez5§ §OEOE3§ §OEOE4§ §EOA1§ §ooez4§ §oeoez31§
§b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;
Prefnum;


LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:sok       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:több       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fél       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:másod       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyed       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötöd       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatod       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:heted       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenced       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tized       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmincad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:század       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezred       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:egy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:két       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:három       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:öt       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hat       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tíz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenegy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhárom       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennégy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenöt       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhat       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennyolc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkilenc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:húsz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
                        Noun2; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Noun2
mérföld AddNoun;
szülött AddNoun;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

! considered words
! befőtt
! bennszülött
! csönd
! csöpp
! egerészölyv
! felnőtt
! félőrült
! föld
! jelölt
! küldött
! megdicsőült
! menekült
! másodszülött
! pörkölt
! szög
! sárgászöld
! sérült
! sült
! torzszülött
! télizöld
! több
! tőgy
! örv
! öröm
! öv
! üröm

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez4§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA1§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4§t§OEOE3§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Gen;
                           Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez31§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNountobb
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posstobb;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Posstobb
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez4§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA1§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4§t§OEOE3§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounoet
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possoet;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Noun
Kabard-Balkárföld AddNoun;
Márokföld AddNoun;
Városföld AddNoun;
alapföld AddNoun;
alappörkölt AddNounoet;
angolnapörkölt AddNounoet;
angyalszög AddNoun;
aranynégyszög AddNoun;
autósmérföld AddNoun;
babapörkölt AddNounoet;
babpörkölt AddNounoet;
barátjelölt AddNoun;
bikajelölt AddNoun;
bikapörkölt AddNounoet;
birkapörkölt AddNounoet;
bográcspörkölt AddNounoet;
bolygójelölt AddNoun;
borjúpörkölt AddNounoet;
brokkolipörkölt AddNounoet;
bronzszög AddNoun;
burgonyapörkölt AddNounoet;
báránypörkölt AddNounoet;
bébipörkölt AddNounoet;
békeküldött AddNoun;
bőrnégyszög AddNoun;
citromöv AddNoun;
cseresznyeföld AddNoun;
csibepörkölt AddNounoet;
csigapörkölt AddNounoet;
csirkepörkölt AddNounoet;
csodafelnőtt AddNoun;
csukapörkölt AddNounoet;
csönd AddNoun;
csülökpörkölt AddNounoet;
dajkaföld AddNoun;
denevérpörkölt AddNounoet;
dióbefőtt AddNoun;
délöv AddNoun;
egerészölyv AddNoun;
emberpörkölt AddNounoet;
emusült AddNoun;
esőöv AddNoun;
fattyúszülött AddNoun;
felnőtt AddNoun;
fiújelölt AddNoun;
forgásszög AddNoun;
fácánpörkölt AddNounoet;
fékháromszög AddNoun;
fénytörésszög AddNoun;
féregpörkölt AddNounoet;
fókapörkölt AddNounoet;
főpásztorjelölt AddNoun;
galambpörkölt AddNounoet;
gazdaságföld AddNoun;
gombapörkölt AddNounoet;
griffpörkölt AddNounoet;
gulyatőgy AddNoun;
gulyáspörkölt AddNounoet;
gyémántföld AddNoun;
gyíkpörkölt AddNounoet;
gázöv AddNoun;
hajdinaföld AddNoun;
halfejpörkölt AddNounoet;
halpörkölt AddNounoet;
harcsapörkölt AddNounoet;
haszonföld AddNoun;
helyszög AddNoun;
herepörkölt AddNounoet;
hodzsajelölt AddNoun;
háromszög AddNoun;
húrhatszög AddNoun;
hüllőpörkölt AddNounoet;
irodalmárjelölt AddNoun;
jelföld AddNoun;
jégföld AddNoun;
kacsapörkölt AddNounoet;
kagylópörkölt AddNounoet;
kakasherepörkölt AddNounoet;
kakaspörkölt AddNounoet;
kakastarajpörkölt AddNounoet;
kameraszög AddNoun;
karakterháromszög AddNoun;
karfiolpörkölt AddNounoet;
kecskepörkölt AddNounoet;
keményfémszög AddNoun;
kilépőszög AddNoun;
kispörkölt AddNounoet;
klímaöv AddNoun;
koporsószög AddNoun;
koszorúszög AddNoun;
kumiszcsöpp AddNoun;
kutyapörkölt AddNounoet;
kávébabföld AddNoun;
kígyósült AddNoun;
körömpörkölt AddNounoet;
kötélöv AddNoun;
labdarúgójelölt AddNoun;
lencsepörkölt AddNounoet;
lenöv AddNoun;
lábszárpörkölt AddNounoet;
láncnyakörv AddNoun;
légypörkölt AddNounoet;
léleköröm AddNoun;
lópörkölt AddNounoet;
macskakörömpörkölt AddNounoet;
macskapörkölt AddNounoet;
malacpörkölt AddNounoet;
malacsült AddNoun;
marhalábszárpörkölt AddNounoet;
marhapörkölt AddNounoet;
medvepörkölt AddNounoet;
meghajtóöv AddNoun;
menzapörkölt AddNounoet;
merénylőjelölt AddNoun;
motorszög AddNoun;
májpörkölt AddNounoet;
málnaföld AddNoun;
mérőszög AddNoun;
nadrágszíjföld AddNoun;
novíciusjelölt AddNoun;
nudlipörkölt AddNounoet;
nyálcsöpp AddNoun;
nyúlpörkölt AddNounoet;
növendékjelölt AddNoun;
olvasztóöv AddNoun;
osztókúpszög AddNoun;
pacalpörkölt AddNounoet;
pacsirtapörkölt AddNounoet;
paradigmajelölt AddNoun;
pecsétföld AddNoun;
pincepörkölt AddNounoet;
pizsamaöv AddNoun;
pontypörkölt AddNounoet;
postaföld AddNoun;
prériföld AddNoun;
pulykapörkölt AddNounoet;
pusztapörkölt AddNounoet;
pápajelölt AddNoun;
póttagjelölt AddNoun;
pörkölt AddNounoet;
remeteföld AddNoun;
rokonjelölt AddNoun;
rákpörkölt AddNounoet;
régészjelölt AddNoun;
rénszarvaspörkölt AddNounoet;
rózsabefőtt AddNoun;
selyemöv AddNoun;
sertéscsülökpörkölt AddNounoet;
sertéspörkölt AddNounoet;
sonkapörkölt AddNounoet;
startszög AddNoun;
szakállföld AddNoun;
szarvaspörkölt AddNounoet;
szelvényszög AddNoun;
szerbpörkölt AddNounoet;
szeszcsöpp AddNoun;
szolgabírójelölt AddNoun;
szélcsönd AddNoun;
szívpörkölt AddNounoet;
szójababföld AddNoun;
szójapörkölt AddNounoet;
szürkeföld AddNoun;
sérült AddNoun;
sörétpörkölt AddNounoet;
sült AddNoun;
sündisznópörkölt AddNounoet;
tanítónőjelölt AddNoun;
taréjpörkölt AddNounoet;
tehénpörkölt AddNounoet;
tengelyszög AddNoun;
testvérföld AddNoun;
tevepörkölt AddNounoet;
tizenegyszög AddNoun;
tojáspörkölt AddNounoet;
tulajdonosjelölt AddNoun;
társjelölt AddNoun;
több AddNountobb;
tökpörkölt AddNounoet;
törésöv AddNoun;
túrópörkölt AddNounoet;
vaddisznópörkölt AddNounoet;
vadfelföld AddNoun;
vadhúspörkölt AddNounoet;
vadnyúlpörkölt AddNounoet;
vadpörkölt AddNounoet;
vektorháromszög AddNoun;
versenypörkölt AddNounoet;
vágásszög AddNoun;
vérpörkölt AddNounoet;
vízcsöpp AddNoun;
zergepörkölt AddNounoet;
zsiráfpörkölt AddNounoet;
zónapörkölt AddNounoet;
zónaöv AddNoun;
zöldségpörkölt AddNounoet;
zúzapörkölt AddNounoet;
égöv AddNoun;
ökörpörkölt AddNounoet;
önküldött AddNoun;
ördögpörkölt AddNounoet;
ürgepörkölt AddNounoet;
őrzőjelölt AddNoun;
őzpörkölt AddNounoet;
